Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 2. Creation and Powers of Public Service Corporations.

§§ 56-47,
56-48.
Repealed by Acts 1956, c. 438.

§ 56-49.
Powers.

In addition to the powers conferred by Title 13.1, each public service corporation of this Commonwealth organized to conduct a public service business other than a railroad shall have the power:

To cause to be made such examinations and surveys for its proposed line or location of its works as are necessary to the selection of the most advantageous location or route or for the improvement or straightening of its line or works, or changes of location
or construction, or providing additional facilities, and for such purposes, by its officers and servants, to enter upon the lands or waters of any person but subject to responsibility for all damages that are done thereto, and
subject to permission from, or notice to, the landowner as provided in §

25.1-203

.

To acquire by the exercise of the right of eminent domain any lands or estates or interests therein, sand, earth, gravel, water or other material, structures, rights-of-way, easements or other interests in lands, including lands under water and riparian
rights, of any person, which are deemed necessary for the purposes of construction, reconstruction, alteration, straightening, relocation, operation, maintenance, improvement or repair of its lines, facilities or works, and for
all its necessary business purposes incidental thereto, for its use in serving the public either directly or indirectly through another public service corporation, including permanent, temporary, continuous, periodical or future
use, whenever the corporation cannot agree on the terms of purchase or settlement with any such person because of the incapacity of such person or because of the inability to agree on the compensation to be paid or other terms
of settlement or purchase, or because any such person cannot with reasonable diligence be found or is unknown, or is a nonresident of the Commonwealth, or is unable to convey valid title to such property. Such proceeding shall
be conducted in the manner provided by Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 and shall be subject to the provisions of §

25.1-102

. However, the corporation shall not take by condemnation proceedings a strip of land for a right-of-way within 60 feet of the dwelling house of any person except (i) when the court having jurisdiction of the condemnation
proceeding finds, after notice of motion to be granted authority to do so to the owner of such dwelling house, given in the manner provided in §§

25.1-209

,

25.1-210

, and

25.1-212

, and a hearing thereon, that it would otherwise be impractical, without unreasonable expense, to construct the proposed works of the corporation at another location; (ii) in case of occupancy of the streets or alleys,
public or private, of any county, city or town, in pursuance of permission obtained from the board of supervisors of such county or the corporate authorities of such city or town; or (iii) in case of occupancy of the highways of
this Commonwealth or of any county, in pursuance of permission from the authorities having jurisdiction over such highways. A public service corporation which has not been (i) allotted territory for public utility service by the
State Corporation Commission or (ii) issued a certificate to provide public utility service shall acquire lands or interests therein by eminent domain as provided in this subdivision for lines, facilities, works or purposes only
after it has obtained any certificate of public convenience and necessity required for such lines, facilities, works or purposes under Chapter 10.1 (§ 56-265.1 et seq.) of this title.And provided, further, that notwithstanding
the foregoing nor any other provision of the law the right of eminent domain shall not be exercised for the purpose of acquiring any lands or estates or interests therein nor any other property for the construction, reconstruction,
maintenance or operation of any pipeline for the transportation of coal.For the purposes of this section, the words “public service corporation” shall include any Virginia limited liability company as defined in § 56-1 that has
been issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing it to furnish telecommunications services of a public utility set forth in subdivision (b) of § 56-265.1 and that seeks to construct or acquire facilities
for use in providing the certificated telecommunications service.

History.
1944, p. 539; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 3866a; 1952, c. 497; 1956, c. 438; 1962, c. 222; 1972, c. 657; 1988, c. 649; 1990, c. 630; 1999, cc. 484, 531; 2003, c. 940; 2004, c. 1028.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 1028, which added the last paragraph of this section, in cl. 3 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act amending § 56-49 of the Code of Virginia, no limited liability company that was issued its certificate of public convenience
and necessity prior to July 1, 2004 shall be deemed to have the power of eminent domain to construct or acquire facilities for use in providing the certificated telecommunications service until it has obtained from the State Corporation
Commission, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, authority to exercise eminent domain powers, which authority shall be granted only if the Commission finds that (i) the public convenience and necessity require the exercise
by the limited liability company of such powers; (ii) the limited liability company’s use of such powers is appropriate for, and will be limited to, its acquisition of or entry upon properties or interests therein that are necessary
for providing the certificated telecommunications service; and (iii) the granting of such authority is in the public interest.”

Acts 2004, c. 1028, cl. 4 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act amending § 56-49 of the Code of Virginia, no limited liability company that was issued its certificate of public convenience and necessity prior to July 1, 2004 shall
be authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain with respect to any real property, including any portion thereof, that is the subject of any action for trespass or related cause of action, which action has been brought in any
court of competent jurisdiction in the Commonwealth, in which action the owner of property asserts in any manner that the same limited liability company, prior to the effective date of this act, entered upon and damaged his property
without prior authorization of the owner, unless the State Corporation Commission has found, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, that such action for trespass or related cause of action has been dismissed following a ruling
on the merits in favor of the limited liability company or pursuant to an agreement settling the matter, or, if judgment has been rendered against the limited liability company, it has satisfied the judgment in full.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 484 and 531, are identical, and in subdivision (2), in the middle of the second sentence, deleted “or” preceding “(ii) in case,” and in the third sentence, inserted “(i)” preceding “allotted territory,” inserted “or (ii) issued
a certificate to provide public utility service” preceding “shall acquire lands,” and deleted “electric” following “this subdivision for.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940 in the first paragraph of subdivision 2, in the second sentence, substituted “Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1” for “Chapter 1.1 (§ 25-46.1 et seq.) of Title 25” and “§

25.1-102

” for “§ 25-233,” and substituted “§§

25.1-209

,

25.1-210

, and

25.1-212

” for “§§ 25-46.9, 25-46.10 and 25-46.12” in clause (i) of the third sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1028, in subdivision 2, substituted “60” for “sixty” in the third sentence and “this title” for “Title 56” at the end of the last sentence; and added the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For note discussing the issues of eminent domain and water allocation as related to coal slurry pipelines, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1983).

For article, “Efficient Compensation for Lost Market Value Due to Fear of Electric Transmission Lines,” see 12 G.M.U. L. Rev. 711 (1990).

For 2000 survey of Virginia property law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 981 (2000).

For student note, “This Land is Your Land? Survey Delegation Laws as a Compensable Taking,” see 25 Wash. & Lee J. Civil Rts. & Soc. Just. 545 (2019).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. § 27.22 Condemnation and Eminent Domain. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-401 Petition for Condemnation of Permanent and Temporary Rights of Entry, Etc.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3A M.J. Canals and Canal Companies, § 2; 7A M.J. Eminent Domain, §§ 2, 11, 15, 97; 19 M.J. Turnpikes and Tollroads, §§ 2, 4.

§ 56-49.01.
Natural gas companies; right of entry upon property.

Any firm, corporation, company, or partnership, organized for the bona fide purpose of operating as a natural gas company as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 717a, as amended, may make such examinations, tests, hand auger borings, appraisals, and surveys for its
proposed line or location of its works as are necessary (i) to satisfy any regulatory requirements and (ii) for the selection of the most advantageous location or route, the improvement or straightening of its line or works, changes
of location or construction, or providing additional facilities, and for such purposes, by its duly authorized officers, agents, or employees, may enter upon any property without the written permission of its owner if (a) the natural
gas company has requested the owner’s permission to inspect the property as provided in subsection B, (b) the owner’s written permission is not received prior to the date entry is proposed, and (c) the natural gas company has given
the owner notice of intent to enter as provided in subsection C. A natural gas company may use motor vehicles, self-propelled machinery, and power equipment on property only after receiving the permission of the landowner or his
agent.

A request for permission to inspect shall (i) be sent to the owner by certified mail, (ii) set forth the date such inspection is proposed to be made, and (iii) be made not less than 15 days prior to the date of the proposed inspection.

Notice of intent to enter shall (i) be sent to the owner by certified mail, (ii) set forth the date of the intended entry, and (iii) be made not less than 15 days prior to the date of mailing of the notice of intent to enter.

Any entry authorized by this section shall not be deemed a trespass. The natural gas company shall make reimbursement for any actual damages resulting from such entry. Nothing in this section shall impair or limit any right of a natural gas company obtained
by (i) the power of eminent domain, (ii) any easement granted by the landowner or his predecessor in title, or (iii) any right-of-way agreement, lease or other agreement by and between a natural gas company and a landowner or their
predecessors in title or interest.

History.
2004, c. 829.

Law Review.

For student note, “This Land is Your Land? Survey Delegation Laws as a Compensable Taking,” see 25 Wash. & Lee J. Civil Rts. & Soc. Just. 545 (2019).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-401 Petition for Condemnation of Permanent and Temporary Rights of Entry, Etc.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
9A M.J. Gas Companies, § 6; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 60; 18 M.J. Trespass, § 14.

§§ 56-49.1 through 56-51.
Repealed by Acts 1956, c. 438.

§ 56-51.1.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 429, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-51.1, pertaining to donation of entire capital stock of turnpike or ferry corporations to Commission or to political subdivisions, was derived from Acts 1952, c. 613; 1954, c. 541; 1956, c. 438.

§§ 56-52 through 56-54.1.

Repealed by Acts 1956, c. 438.